Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1309
Right to confess judgment; creditor's assent necessary.

Any person indebted, or against whom a cause of action exists, may personally appear, in a court of competent jurisdiction, and, with the assent of the creditor or person having such cause of action, confess judgment therefor, whereupon judgment shall be entered accordingly.

R.S.1867, Code § 433, p. 466;

R.S.1913, § 8002;

C.S.1922, § 8943;

C.S.1929, § 20-1309;

R.S.1943, § 25-1309.

General appearance is sufficient; actual physical presence of defendant is unnecessary. Thornhill v. Hargreaves, 76 Neb. 582, 107 N.W. 847 (1906).

Where corporation is already in default of answer, judgment may be entered upon stipulation without warrant to attorney. Alter v. State ex rel. Kountze Bros., 62 Neb. 239, 86 N.W. 1080 (1901).

Confession of judgment by corporation must be made by warrant of attorney. Fogg v. Ellis, 61 Neb. 829, 86 N.W. 494 (1901).

Corporation for pecuniary profit may confess judgment. Solomon Co. v. Schneider & Co., 56 Neb. 680, 77 N.W. 65 (1898).

Manager of corporation has no power to confess judgment. Howell v. Gilt Edge Mfg. Co., 32 Neb. 627, 49 N.W. 704 (1891).

Creditor's assent is necessary; but is presumed where defendant confesses sum demanded in petition. Flanigan v. Continental Ins. Co., 22 Neb. 235, 34 N.W. 367 (1887).